Massachusetts, session 194th, H4180.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 14 of Chapter 19B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following words: "The Department
of Developmental Services shall not deny Intellectual Disability Services for Intellectual
Disability under (115CMR 2.0) on the basis of IQ testing score alone, but shall take into
consideration all Neuropsychological evaluations of the individual."
of 1